Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 55. Sentencing and Probation.
Sec. 12.55.125.
Sentences of imprisonment for felonies.

A defendant convicted of murder in the first degree or murder of an unborn child under AS

11.41.150(a)(1)

shall be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of at least 30 years but not more than 99 years. A defendant convicted of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a mandatory term of imprisonment of 99 years when

the defendant is convicted of the murder of a uniformed or otherwise clearly identified peace officer, firefighter, or correctional employee who was engaged in the performance of official duties at the time of the murder;

the defendant has been previously convicted of

murder in the first degree under AS

11.41.100

or former AS

11.15.010

or 11.15.020;

murder in the second degree under AS

11.41.110

or former AS 11.15.030; or

homicide under the laws of another jurisdiction when the offense of which the defendant was convicted contains elements similar to first degree murder under AS

11.41.100

or second degree murder under AS

11.41.110

;

the defendant subjected the murder victim to substantial physical torture;

the defendant is convicted of the murder of and personally caused the death of a person, other than a participant, during a robbery; or

the defendant is a peace officer who used the officer’s authority as a peace officer to facilitate the murder.

A defendant convicted of attempted murder in the first degree, solicitation to commit murder in the first degree, conspiracy to commit murder in the first degree, kidnapping, or misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first degree shall be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of at least five years but not more than 99 years. A defendant convicted of murder in the second degree or murder of an unborn child under AS

11.41.150(a)(2)

— (4) shall be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of at least 15 years but not more than 99 years. A defendant convicted of murder in the second degree shall be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of at least 20 years but not more than 99 years when the defendant is convicted of the murder of a child under 16 years of age and the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant (1) was a natural parent, a stepparent, an adoptive parent, a legal guardian, or a person occupying a position of authority in relation to the child; or (2) caused the death of the child by committing a crime against a person under AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.530

. In this subsection, “legal guardian” and “position of authority” have the meanings given in AS

11.41.470

.

Except as provided in (i) of this section, a defendant convicted of a class A felony may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 20 years, and shall be sentenced to a definite term within the following presumptive ranges, subject to adjustment as provided in AS

12.55.155

—

12.55.175

:

if the offense is a first felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (2) of this subsection, four to seven years;

if the offense is a first felony conviction

and the defendant possessed a firearm, used a dangerous instrument, or caused serious physical injury or death during the commission of the offense, or knowingly directed the conduct constituting the offense at a uniformed or otherwise clearly identified peace officer, firefighter, correctional employee, emergency medical technician, paramedic, ambulance attendant, or other emergency responder who was engaged in the performance of official duties at the time of the offense, seven to 11 years;

and the conviction is for manufacturing related to methamphetamine under AS

11.71.021(a)(2)(A)

or (B), seven to 11 years if

the manufacturing occurred in a building with reckless disregard that the building was used as a permanent or temporary home or place of lodging for one or more children under 18 years of age or the building was a place frequented by children; or

in the course of manufacturing or in preparation for manufacturing, the defendant obtained the assistance of one or more children under 18 years of age or one or more children were present;

if the offense is a second felony conviction, 10 to 14 years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction and the defendant is not subject to sentencing under (l) of this section, 15 to 20 years.

Except as provided in (i) of this section, a defendant convicted of a class B felony may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 10 years, and shall be sentenced to a definite term within the following presumptive ranges, subject to adjustment as provided in AS

12.55.155

—

12.55.175

:

if the offense is a first felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (2) of this subsection, one to three years; a defendant sentenced under this paragraph may, if the court finds it appropriate, be granted a suspended imposition of sentence under AS

12.55.085

if, as a condition of probation under AS

12.55.086

, the defendant is required to serve an active term of imprisonment within the range specified in this paragraph, unless the court finds that a mitigation factor under AS

12.55.155

applies;

if the offense is a first felony conviction,

the defendant violated AS

11.41.130

, and the victim was a child under 16 years of age, two to four years;

two to four years if the conviction is for attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to manufacture related to methamphetamine under AS 11.31 and AS

11.71.021(a)(2)(A)

or (B), and

the attempted manufacturing occurred, or the solicited or conspired offense was to have occurred, in a building with reckless disregard that the building was used as a permanent or temporary home or place of lodging for one or more children under 18 years of age or the building was a place frequented by children; or

in the course of an attempt to manufacture, the defendant obtained the assistance of one or more children under 18 years of age or one or more children were present;

if the offense is a second felony conviction, three to seven years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction, six to 10 years.

Except as provided in (i) of this section, a defendant convicted of a class C felony may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than five years, and shall be sentenced to a definite term within the following presumptive ranges, subject to adjustment as provided in AS

12.55.155

—

12.55.175

:

if the offense is a first felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (4) of this subsection, zero to two years; a defendant sentenced under this paragraph may, if the court finds it appropriate, be granted a suspended imposition of sentence under AS

12.55.085

, and the court may, as a condition of probation under AS

12.55.086

, require the defendant to serve an active term of imprisonment within the range specified in this paragraph;

if the offense is a second felony conviction, two to four years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction, three to five years;

if the offense is a first felony conviction, and the defendant violated AS

08.54.720(a)(15)

, one to two years.

If a defendant is sentenced under (a) or (b) of this section,

imprisonment for the prescribed minimum or mandatory term may not be suspended under AS

12.55.080

;

imposition of sentence may not be suspended under AS

12.55.085

;

imprisonment for the prescribed minimum or mandatory term may not be reduced, except as provided in (j) of this section.

If a defendant is sentenced under (c), (d), (e), or (i) of this section, except to the extent permitted under AS

12.55.155

—

12.55.175

,

imprisonment may not be suspended under AS

12.55.080

below the low end of the presumptive range;

and except as provided in (d)(1) or (e)(1) of this section, imposition of sentence may not be suspended under AS

12.55.085

;

terms of imprisonment may not be otherwise reduced.

Nothing in this section or AS

12.55.135

limits the discretion of the sentencing judge except as specifically provided. Nothing in (a) of this section limits the court’s discretion to impose a sentence of 99 years imprisonment, or to limit parole eligibility, for a person convicted of murder in the first or second degree in circumstances other than those enumerated in (a).

A defendant convicted of

sexual assault in the first degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree, unlawful exploitation of a minor under AS

11.41.455(c)(2)

, or sex trafficking in the first degree under AS

11.66.110(a)(2)

may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 99 years and shall be sentenced to a definite term within the following presumptive ranges, subject to adjustment as provided in AS

12.55.155

—

12.55.175

:

if the offense is a first felony conviction, the offense does not involve circumstances described in (B) of this paragraph, and the victim was

less than 13 years of age, 25 to 35 years;

13 years of age or older, 20 to 30 years;

if the offense is a first felony conviction and the defendant possessed a firearm, used a dangerous instrument, or caused serious physical injury during the commission of the offense, 25 to 35 years;

if the offense is a second felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (D) of this paragraph, 30 to 40 years;

if the offense is a second felony conviction and the defendant has a prior conviction for a sexual felony, 35 to 45 years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction and the defendant is not subject to sentencing under (F) of this paragraph or (l) of this section, 40 to 60 years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction, the defendant is not subject to sentencing under (l) of this section, and the defendant has two prior convictions for sexual felonies, 99 years;

unlawful exploitation of a minor under AS

11.41.455(c)(1)

, enticement of a minor under AS

11.41.452(e)

, or attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit sexual assault in the first degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree, or sex trafficking in the first degree under AS

11.66.110(a)(2)

may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 99 years and shall be sentenced to a definite term within the following presumptive ranges, subject to adjustment as provided in AS

12.55.155

—

12.55.175

:

if the offense is a first felony conviction, the offense does not involve circumstances described in (B) of this paragraph, and the victim was

under 13 years of age, 20 to 30 years;

13 years of age or older, 15 to 30 years;

if the offense is a first felony conviction and the defendant possessed a firearm, used a dangerous instrument, or caused serious physical injury during the commission of the offense, 25 to 35 years;

if the offense is a second felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (D) of this paragraph, 25 to 35 years;

if the offense is a second felony conviction and the defendant has a prior conviction for a sexual felony, 30 to 40 years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction, the offense does not involve circumstances described in (F) of this paragraph, and the defendant is not subject to sentencing under (l) of this section, 35 to 50 years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction, the defendant is not subject to sentencing under (l) of this section, and the defendant has two prior convictions for sexual felonies, 99 years;

sexual assault in the second degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree, enticement of a minor under AS

11.41.452(d)

, indecent exposure in the first degree under AS

11.41.458(b)(2)

, or distribution of child pornography under AS

11.61.125(e)(2)

may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 99 years and shall be sentenced to a definite term within the following presumptive ranges, subject to adjustment as provided in AS 12.55.155 — 12.55.175:

if the offense is a first felony conviction, five to 15 years;

if the offense is a second felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (C) of this paragraph, 10 to 25 years;

if the offense is a second felony conviction and the defendant has a prior conviction for a sexual felony, 15 to 30 years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (E) of this paragraph, 20 to 35 years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction and the defendant has two prior convictions for sexual felonies, 99 years;

sexual assault in the third degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree under AS

11.41.438(c)

, incest, indecent exposure in the first degree under AS

11.41.458(b)(1)

, indecent viewing or production of a picture under AS

11.61.123(f)(1)

or (2), possession of child pornography, distribution of child pornography under AS

11.61.125(e)(1)

, or attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit sexual assault in the second degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree, unlawful exploitation of a minor, or distribution of child pornography, may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 99 years and shall be sentenced to a definite term within the following presumptive ranges, subject to adjustment as provided in AS 12.55.155 — 12.55.175:

if the offense is a first felony conviction and does not involve the circumstances described in (B) or (C) of this paragraph, two to 12 years;

if the offense is a first felony conviction under AS

11.61.125(e)(1)

and does not involve circumstances described in (C) of this paragraph, four to 12 years;

if the offense is a first felony conviction under AS 11.61.125(e)(1), and the defendant hosted, created, or helped host or create a mechanism for multi-party sharing or distribution of child pornography, or received a financial benefit or had a financial interest in a child pornography sharing or distribution mechanism, six to 14 years;

if the offense is a second felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (E) of this paragraph, eight to 15 years;

if the offense is a second felony conviction and the defendant has a prior conviction for a sexual felony, 12 to 20 years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (G) of this paragraph, 15 to 25 years;

if the offense is a third felony conviction and the defendant has two prior convictions for sexual felonies, 99 years.

A defendant sentenced to a (1) mandatory term of imprisonment of 99 years under (a) of this section may apply once for a modification or reduction of sentence under the Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure after serving one-half of the mandatory term without consideration of good time earned under AS

33.20.010

, or (2) definite term of imprisonment under (l) of this section may apply once for a modification or reduction of sentence under the Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure after serving one-half of the definite term. A defendant may not file and a court may not entertain more than one motion for modification or reduction of a sentence subject to this subsection, regardless of whether or not the court granted or denied a previous motion.

[Repealed, § 32 ch 2 SLA 2005.]

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a defendant convicted of an unclassified or class A felony offense, and not subject to a mandatory 99-year sentence under (a) of this section, shall be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of 99 years when the defendant has been previously convicted of two or more most serious felonies. If a defendant is sentenced to a definite term under this subsection,

imprisonment for the prescribed definite term may not be suspended under AS

12.55.080

;

imposition of sentence may not be suspended under AS

12.55.085

;

imprisonment for the prescribed definite term may not be reduced, except as provided in (j) of this section.

Notwithstanding (a)(4) and (f) of this section, if a court finds that imposition of a mandatory term of imprisonment of 99 years on a defendant subject to sentencing under (a)(4) of this section would be manifestly unjust, the court may sentence the defendant to a definite term of imprisonment otherwise permissible under (a) of this section.

In imposing a sentence within a presumptive range under (c), (d), (e), or (i) of this section, the total term, made up of the active term of imprisonment plus any suspended term of imprisonment, must fall within the presumptive range, and the active term of imprisonment may not fall below the lower end of the presumptive range.

[Repealed, § 179 ch. 36 SLA 2016.]

If the state seeks either (1) the imposition of a sentence under (a) of this section that would preclude the defendant from being awarded a good time deduction under AS

33.20.010(a)

based on a fact other than a prior conviction; or (2) to establish a fact that would increase the presumptive sentencing range under (c)(2), (d)(2), (e)(4), (i)(1)(A) or (B), or (i)(2)(A) or (B) of this section, the factual question required to be decided shall be presented to a trial jury and proven beyond a reasonable doubt under procedures set by the court, unless the defendant waives trial by jury and either stipulates to the existence of the fact or consents to have the fact proven to the court sitting without a jury. Written notice of the intent to establish a fact under this subsection must be served on the defendant and filed with the court as provided for notice under AS

12.55.155(f)(2)

.

Other than for convictions subject to a mandatory 99-year sentence, the court shall impose, in addition to an active term of imprisonment imposed under (i) of this section, a minimum period of (1) suspended imprisonment of five years and a minimum period of probation supervision of 15 years for conviction of an unclassified felony, (2) suspended imprisonment of three years and a minimum period of probation supervision of 10 years for conviction of a class A or class B felony, or (3) suspended imprisonment of two years and a minimum period of probation supervision of five years for conviction of a class C felony. The period of probation is in addition to any sentence received under (i) of this section and may not be suspended or reduced. Upon a defendant’s release from confinement in a correctional facility, the defendant is subject to the probation requirement under this subsection and shall submit and comply with the terms and requirements of the probation.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 18 ch 45 SLA 1982; am §§ 28 — 30 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 78 SLA 1983; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 92 SLA 1983; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 37 SLA 1989; am §§ 23 — 25 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 3 SLA 1994; am §§ 1, 2, 6 ch 6 SLA 1996; am §§ 3 — 7 ch 7 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 33 SLA 1996; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 54 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 65 SLA 1999; am §§ 1, 2 ch 49 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 60 SLA 2002; am §§ 1 — 5 ch 90 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 99 SLA 2004; am §§ 8 — 13, 32 ch 2 SLA 2005; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 14 SLA 2006; am §§ 14, 15 ch 53 SLA 2006; am §§ 8, 9 ch 73 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 8 SLA 2007; am § 23 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 9 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 18 ch 20 SLA 2011; am § 20 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am §§ 11, 12 ch 70 SLA 2012; am §§
86 — 90, 179 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 32 — 34 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§
70 — 74 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “firearm,” “serious physical injury,” “first felony conviction,” “second felony conviction,” “third felony conviction” — AS

12.55.185

Classification of offenses — AS

11.81.250

Prior convictions — AS

12.55.145

Factors in aggravation and mitigation — AS

12.55.155

Extraordinary circumstances — AS

12.55.165

Three-judge sentencing panel — AS

12.55.175

Granting of parole — AS 33.15.080

Persons eligible for parole — AS 33.15.180

Computation of good time — AS

33.20.010

Original Code Provision — AS

12.55.040

; AS

12.55.050

.

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, paragraphs (c)(2) and (d)(2) were rewritten to give effect to the 2016 amendments and repeals in those paragraphs.

Cross references. —

For classification of felonies and misdemeanors, see AS

11.81.250

; for authorized fines, see AS

12.55.035

; for reduction of sentence for good behavior, see AS

33.20.010

. For effect of subsection (p) on Rule 32.1, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, see § 16, ch.
70, SLA 2012.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see secs. 185(a)(32) and (33), (u)(1) — (3), and (v), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsections (c) and (e) and enactment of (q) see sec. 75(b)(2) — (4), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a statement of legislative intent regarding the 2019 amendment to (i) of this section, see § 1, ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, in the 2019 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (b), substituted “adoptive” for “adopted” following “(1) was a natural parent, a stepparent, an”.

The 2011 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, in (i)(2), added “unlawful exploitation of a minor under AS

11.41.455(c)(2)

, online enticement of a minor under AS

11.41.452(e)

, or” at the beginning of the paragraph; in (i)(3) added “online enticement of a minor under AS

11.41.452(d)

” following “minor in the second degree,” “under AS

11.41.455(c)(1)

” following “unlawful exploitation of a minor,” and “under AS

11.61.125(e)(2)

” following “distribution of child pornography”; and in (i)(4) added “distribution of child pornography under AS

11.61.125(e)(1)

” following “possession of child pornography”.

The first 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, deleted “The court finds by clear and convincing evidence that” in (a)(3) and (a)(5); added (p).

The second 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (i), substituted “sex trafficking” for “promoting prostitution” twice.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “30 years” for “20 years”; in (b), in the second sentence, substituted “15 years” for “10 years”; in (c)(1), substituted “three to six years” for “five to eight years”, in (c)(2)(A), substituted “five to nine years” for “seven to eleven years”, in (c)(3), substituted “eight to 12 years for “10 to 14 years”, repealed (c)(2)(BZ), in (c)(4), substituted “13 to 20 years” for “15 to 20 years”; in (d)(1), substituted “zero to two years” for “one to three years” and deleted “if, as a condition of probation under AS

12.55.086

, the defendant is required to serve an active term of imprisonment within the range specified in this paragraph, unless the court finds that a mitigation factor under AS

12.55.155

applies”, at the end; in (d)(2)(A), designated a portion of (A) as (i) and added (d)(2)(A)(ii), repealed (d)(2)(B), in (d)(3), substituted “two to five years” for “four to seven years”, in (d)(4), substituted “four to 10 years” for “six to 10 years”; in (e)(1), inserted “probation, with a suspended term of imprisonment of” preceding “zero”; substituted “18 months” for “two years”; deleted “, and the court may, as a condition of probation under AS

12.55.086

, require the defendant to serve an active term of imprisonment within the range specified in this paragraph” following “AS

12.55.085

”, in (e)(2), substituted “one to three years” for “two to four years”, in (e)(3), substituted “two to five years” for “three to five years”; in (e)(4), designated a portion of (4) as (A); added (e)(4)(B) - (D); repealed (o); and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (c), inserted “five to nine years;” at the end of (c)(2)(A), substituted “seven to 11 years” for “five to nine years” at the end of (c)(2)(B) and made related changes; in the introductory language in (e)(1), substituted “zero to two years” for “probation, with a suspended term of imprisonment of zero to 18 months” following “(4) of this subsection,” and inserted “, and the court may, as a condition of probation under AS

12.55.086

, require the defendant to serve an active term of imprisonment within the range specified in this paragraph;” at the end; in (e)(2), substituted “one to four years” for “one to three years”; rewrote (e)(4); added (q).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (c), substituted “four to seven years” for “three to six years” in (1), rewrote (2), which read, “(2) if the offense is a first felony conviction and the defendant

“(A) possessed a firearm, used a dangerous instrument, or caused serious physical injury or death during the commission of the offense, five to nine years; or

“(B) knowingly directed the conduct constituting the offense at a uniformed or otherwise clearly identified peace officer, firefighter, correctional employee, emergency medical technician, paramedic, ambulance attendant, or other emergency responder who was engaged in the performance of official duties at the time of the offense, seven to 11 years;” substituted “10 to 14 years” for “eight to 12 years” in (3), and substituted “15 to 20 years” for “13 to 20 years” in (4); in (d), rewrote (1) and (2), which read, “(1) if the offense is a first felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (2) of this subsection, zero to two years; a defendant sentenced under this paragraph may, if the court finds it appropriate, be granted a suspended imposition of sentence under AS

12.55.085

;

“(2) if the offense is a first felony conviction, the defendant violated AS

11.41.130

, and the victim was

“(A) a child under 16 years of age, two to four years; or

“(B) was 16 years of age or older, one to three years;”, substituted “three to seven years” for “two to five years” in (3) and “six to 10 years” for “four to 10 years” in (4); in (e), substituted “two to four years” for “one to four years” in (2) and “three to five years” for “two to five years” in (4); in (i), inserted “unlawful exploitation of a minor under AS

11.41.455(c)(2)

,” in (1), substituted “AS

11.41.455(c)(1)

, enticement” for “AS

11.41.455(c)(2)

, online enticement” in the introductory paragraph of (2), substituted “second degree, enticement of a minor under AS

11.41.452(d)

, indecent exposure in the first degree under AS

11.41.458(b)(2)

” for “second degree, online enticement of a minor under AS

11.41.452(d)

, unlawful exploitation of a minor under AS

11.41.455(c)(1)

” in the introductory paragraph of (3), rewrote (4), which read, “(4) sexual assault in the third degree, incest, indecent exposure in the first degree, possession of child pornography, distribution of child pornography under AS

11.61.125(e)(1)

, or attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit sexual assault in the second degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree, unlawful exploitation of a minor, or distribution of child pornography, may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 99 years and shall be sentenced to a definite term within the following presumptive ranges, subject to adjustment as provided in AS

12.55.155

—

12.55.175

:

“(A) if the offense is a first felony conviction, two to 12 years;

“(B) if the offense is a second felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (C) of this paragraph, eight to 15 years;

“(C) if the offense is a second felony conviction and the defendant has a prior conviction for a sexual felony, 12 to 20 years;

“(D) if the offense is a third felony conviction and does not involve circumstances described in (E) of this paragraph, 15 to 25 years;

“(E) if the offense is a third felony conviction and the defendant has two prior convictions for sexual felonies, 99 years.”; in (q), added “and may not be suspended or reduced” at the end of the second sentence, and added the third sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Subsection (b) was amended by § 9, ch. 54, SLA 1999, with an effective date of June 5, 1999, and was further amended by § 1, ch. 65, SLA 1999, with a later effective date of September 20, 1999.
Thus, on and after June 5 and before September 20, 1999, subsection (b) read as follows: “A defendant convicted of murder in the second degree, attempted murder in the first degree, solicitation to commit murder in the first degree, conspiracy to commit murder in the first degree, kidnapping, or misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first degree shall be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of at least five years but not more than 99 years. A defendant convicted of murder in the second degree shall be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of at least 20 years but not more than 99 years when the defendant is convicted of the murder of a child under 16 years of age and the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant (1) was a natural parent, a stepparent, an adopted parent, a legal guardian, or a person occupying a position of authority in relation to the child; or (2) caused the death of the child by committing a crime against a person under AS

11.41.200

—11.41.530. In this subsection, “legal guardian” and “position of authority” have the meanings given in AS

11.41.470

.”

Section 12(a), ch. 90, SLA 2003 provides that the provisions of §§ 1 — 5, ch. 90, SLA 2003 amending this section apply “to sentencings for offenses committed on or after September 11, 2003,” and that “[a]ll references to prior or previous convictions in [that section] apply to convictions occurring before, on, or after September 1, 2003.”

Section 33, ch. 2, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 amendment of (c)-(e), (g), and (i) of this section, the enactment of (n) of this section, and the repeal of (k) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after March 23, 2005,” and, in addition, provides that references to prior offenses or convictions in those subsections “include offenses committed before, on, or after March 23, 2005.”
See § 33, ch. 2, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Section 13, ch. 14, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendments of (i), (j) and (

l

) of this section and the 2006 enactment of (o) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after April 28, 2006,” and that references to prior offenses or convictions in (i) and (

l

) of this section, as those subsections are amended by ch. 14, SLA 2006, “include offenses committed before, on or after April 28, 2006.”

Section 22, ch. 53, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendments of (c)(2) and (d)(2) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after June 3, 2006.”

Section 3, ch. 8, SLA 2007, provides that the 2007 addition of (a)(5) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 26, 2007.”

Section 36(d), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that the 2007 amendment of (i)(1) and (i)(2) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Section 17, ch. 70, SLA 2012 provides that the 2012 amendment to subsection (a) applies “to proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2012 for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2012” and that subsection (p) applies “to sentencing proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2012 for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2012.”

Section 27(a), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to subsection (i) apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Section 142(b),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to (c) – (e), (i), and (q) of this section apply “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 - 1668.

Sec. 12.55.127.
Consecutive and concurrent terms of imprisonment.

If a defendant is required to serve a term of imprisonment under a separate judgment, a term of imprisonment imposed in a later judgment, amended judgment, or probation revocation shall be consecutive.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, if a defendant is being sentenced for two or more crimes in a single judgment, terms of imprisonment may be concurrent or partially concurrent.

If the defendant is being sentenced for

escape, the term of imprisonment shall be consecutive to the term for the underlying crime;

two or more crimes under AS 11.41, a consecutive term of imprisonment shall be imposed for at least

the mandatory minimum term under AS

12.55.125(a)

for each additional crime that is murder in the first degree;

the mandatory minimum term for each additional crime that is an unclassified felony governed by AS

12.55.125(b)

;

the presumptive term specified in AS

12.55.125(c)

or the active term of imprisonment, whichever is less, for each additional crime that is

manslaughter; or

kidnapping that is a class A felony;

two years or the active term of imprisonment, whichever is less, for each additional crime that is criminally negligent homicide;

one-fourth of the presumptive term under AS

12.55.125(c)

or (i) for each additional crime that is sexual assault in the first degree under AS

11.41.410

or sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree under AS

11.41.434

, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit those offenses; and

some additional term of imprisonment for each additional crime, or each additional attempt or solicitation to commit the offense, under AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.250

,

11.41.420

—

11.41.432

,

11.41.436

—

11.41.458

, or

11.41.500

—

11.41.520

.

If the defendant is being sentenced for two or more crimes of distribution of child pornography under AS

11.61.125

, possession of child pornography under AS

11.61.127

, or distribution of indecent material to minors under AS

11.61.128

, a consecutive term of imprisonment shall be imposed for some additional term of imprisonment for each additional crime or each additional attempt or solicitation to commit the offense.

In this section,

“active term of imprisonment” means the total term of imprisonment imposed for a crime, minus suspended imprisonment;

“additional crime” means a crime that is not the primary crime;

“presumptive term” means the middle of the applicable presumptive range set out in AS

12.55.125

;

“primary crime” means the crime

for which the sentencing court imposes the longest active term of imprisonment; or

that is designated by the sentencing court as the primary crime when no single crime has the longest active term of imprisonment.

History.

(§ 3 ch 125 SLA 2004; am § 14 ch 2 SLA 2005; am § 21 ch 43 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

In (d) (now (e)) of this section, paragraph (3) was enacted as paragraph (4) and renumbered in 2005, at which time former paragraph (d)(3) was renumbered as paragraph (d)(4).

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e) and relettered in 2013, at which time section (d) was relettered as (e).

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (e) (now (d)).

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, subsection (e), enacted in sec. 21, ch. 43, SLA 2013, applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.